Arkansas, session 2025, SB360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - OUT-OF-SCHOOL TIME PROGRAM GRANTS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be payable from the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education Public School Fund Account,
for a grant program for comprehensive out-of-school time programs for school
aged children which shall provide evidence-based academic enhancement
programs and activities that align with and support state curriculum
standards by the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) OUT-OF-SCHOOL TIME PROGRAM GRANTS $1,700,000
*KMW036*
03/03/2025 1:16:02 PM KMW036

SB360

SECTION 2. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. OUT-OF-
SCHOOL TIME PROGRAM GRANTS REQUIREMENTS. (a)Of the amount appropriated to
the Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary Education
for Out-Of-School Time Program Grants in this act, funding shall only be made
available to eligible entities for comprehensive out-of-school time programs
for school aged children.
(b) Eligible programs shall be limited to applicants meeting the following
criteria:
(1) Provide out-of-school time programs during the school year to school
aged children;
(2) Provide regular activities designed for evidence-based academic
enhancement that aligns and supports state curriculum standards and will
include a minimum of two of the following five activity areas:
(A)STEM (Science, Technology, Engineering and Math);
(B)Academic support;
(C)Goal setting / leadership;
(D)Career exposure/Workforce Readiness; and
(E)Community service.
(3) Provide activities above as a part of a comprehensive out-of-school
program;
(4) Operate for a minimum of 12 hours weekly during the school year;
minimum of four days per week during the calendar school year; not including
school breaks such as holiday or seasonal;
(5) Collect data on participants’ demographics, attendance and program
participation and compile statewide aggregated data;
(6) Implement rigorous safety standards including employee background
checks, compliance with mandated reporting laws; and
(7) Must be a qualified 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) organization that has been
in operation for more than 5 years and has a record of fiscal accountability.
Organizations must also provide a sustainability model with a minimum of 50%
of funding derived from non-state resources.
(c)The Department of Education - Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall promulgate rules for the determination of eligibility and
administration of the Out-Of-School Time Program Grants.
03/03/2025 1:16:02 PM KMW036

SB360
(d)The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 3. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.



03/03/2025 1:16:02 PM KMW036